lexc/verb/enhuigeoik.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+  +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§felteo§ §j§ §szorelol§ §igetattetoe§
§sj§  §igeoe§ §l§ §igeoo§

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Prefigekoto;
Verb1;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON AddVerb
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep;

LEXICON Rep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imper;
+Rep:^+cRep^g§AA§t  Imper;
                    Imper1;

LEXICON Imper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep2;
LEXICON Imper1
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep; ! §tatt§
                      Nrep1;

LEXICON Nrep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;
LEXICON Nrep2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;

LEXICON Nrep1
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper1;

LEXICON NImper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;
LEXICON NImper2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;

LEXICON NImper1
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;  ! §tatt§
                      Pot1;

LEXICON Pot
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;
LEXICON Pot2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;

LEXICON Pot1
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case1; ! case1 if differs
LEXICON AddInf
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
              Case;

LEXICON Verb
adaptálódik:adaptálód AddVerb;
agilisedik:agilised AddVerb;
akaratlanodik:akaratlanod AddVerb;
aktuálisodik:aktuálisod AddVerb;
aljaskodik:aljaskod AddVerb;
alázatoskodik:alázatoskod AddVerb;
anarchikuskodik:anarchikuskod AddVerb;
antibiotikusodik:antibiotikusod AddVerb;
apadhatatlanodik:apadhatatlanod AddVerb;
argumentálódik:argumentálód AddVerb;
aszketikusodik:aszketikusod AddVerb;
babonázódik:babonázód AddVerb;
balliberáliskodik:balliberáliskod AddVerb;
baszódik:baszód AddVerb;
betonozódik:betonozód AddVerb;
bizonytalankodik:bizonytalankod AddVerb;
bodrozódik:bodrozód AddVerb;
bolyhozódik:bolyhozód AddVerb;
bosszulatlanodik:bosszulatlanod AddVerb;
burkolatlanodik:burkolatlanod AddVerb;
bányászódik:bányászód AddVerb;
bölcselkedik:bölcselked AddVerb;
bővelkedik:bővelked AddVerb;
cigányodik:cigányod AddVerb;
combosodik:combosod AddVerb;
csapágyasodik:kicsapágyasod AddVerb;
csenevészedik:csenevészed AddVerb;
csillagosodik:csillagosod AddVerb;
csomagolódik:csomagolód AddVerb;
csuszamodik:csuszamod AddVerb;
csúfolódik:csúfolód AddVerb;
dagasztódik:dagasztód AddVerb;
deformálódik:deformálód AddVerb;
demokratizálódik:demokratizálód AddVerb;
dezorganizálódik:dezorganizálód AddVerb;
dimenzionálódik:dimenzionálód AddVerb;
dobódik:dobód AddVerb;
dramatikusodik:dramatikusod AddVerb;
durváskodik:durváskod AddVerb;
dísztelenkedik:dísztelenked AddVerb;
egalizálódik:egalizálód AddVerb;
egészítődik:egészítőd AddVerb;
ellenségeskedik:ellenségesked AddVerb;
elővigyázatlankodik:elővigyázatlankod AddVerb;
engesztelhetetlenkedik:engesztelhetetlenked AddVerb;
erőtlenedik:erőtlened AddVerb;
exkuzálódik:exkuzálód AddVerb;
fajtalankodik:fajtalankod AddVerb;
fasizálódik:fasizálód AddVerb;
fejlesztődik:fejlesztőd AddVerb;
felülmúlhatatlanodik:felülmúlhatatlanod AddVerb;
ficánkolódik:ficánkolód AddVerb;
finomkodik:finomkod AddVerb;
fodrosodik:fodrosod AddVerb;
foglalkodik:foglalkod AddVerb;
folytatódik:folytatód AddVerb;
forgolódik:forgolód AddVerb;
fotografálódik:fotografálód AddVerb;
furakodik:furakod AddVerb;
fázódik:fázód AddVerb;
fércelődik:fércelőd AddVerb;
fölülmúlhatatlankodik:fölülmúlhatatlankod AddVerb;
fűtődik:fűtőd AddVerb;
generálódikóak:generálódikó AddVerb;
gondatlanodik:gondatlanod AddVerb;
gubancolódik:gubancolód AddVerb;
gyapjaskodik:gyapjaskod AddVerb;
gyámoltalankodik:gyámoltalankod AddVerb;
gyúródik:gyúród AddVerb;
gémberedik:gémbered AddVerb;
habókosodik:habókosod AddVerb;
halasztódik:halasztód AddVerb;
hamarkodik:hamarkod AddVerb;
hantolódik:hantolód AddVerb;
hasznosítódik:hasznosítód AddVerb;
határolódik:határolód AddVerb;
hazugodik:hazugod AddVerb;
heroikuskodik:heroikuskod AddVerb;
hibásodik:hibásod AddVerb;
hitelesítődik:hitelesítőd AddVerb;
honosodik:honosod AddVerb;
hozzátanulódik:hozzátanulód AddVerb;
huzagolatlanodik:huzagolatlanod AddVerb;
hámozódik:hámozód AddVerb;
hígítatlanodik:hígítatlanod AddVerb;
hűtlenkedik:hűtlenked AddVerb;
igazolódik:igazolód AddVerb;
illírellenesedik:illírellenesed AddVerb;
incselkedik:incselked AddVerb;
ingerkedik:ingerked AddVerb;
ionizálódik:ionizálód AddVerb;
iskolázatlankodik:iskolázatlankod AddVerb;
izgágáskodik:izgágáskod AddVerb;
jelentéktelenkedik:jelentéktelenked AddVerb;
jutalmazatlanodik:jutalmazatlanod AddVerb;
józanodik:józanod AddVerb;
kampóskodik:kampóskod AddVerb;
kapitalistaellenesedik:kapitalistaellenesed AddVerb;
karsztosodik:karsztosod AddVerb;
kedvetlenkedik:kedvetlenked AddVerb;
kelődik:kelőd AddVerb;
keskenyedik:keskenyed AddVerb;
kivulkanizálódik:kivulkanizálód AddVerb;
komiszodik:komiszod AddVerb;
komplikálódik:komplikálód AddVerb;
konfirmálódik:konfirmálód AddVerb;
konvergálódik:konvergálód AddVerb;
korlátozatlanodik:korlátozatlanod AddVerb;
koszoskodik:koszoskod AddVerb;
kufárkodik:kufárkod AddVerb;
kupeckodik:kupeckod AddVerb;
káplánkodik:káplánkod AddVerb;
kényelmetlenkedik:kényelmetlenked AddVerb;
késedelmeskedik:késedelmesked AddVerb;
kísérleteződik:kísérleteződ AddVerb;
köteleződik:köteleződ AddVerb;
közvetlenkedik:közvetlenked AddVerb;
lakkozatlanodik:lakkozatlanod AddVerb;
lassabbkodik:lassabbkod AddVerb;
legyeskedik:legyesked AddVerb;
leselkedik:leselked AddVerb;
linkelődik:linkelőd AddVerb;
lyukacsosodik:lyukacsosod AddVerb;
magabiztosodik:magabiztosod AddVerb;
maliciózuskodik:maliciózuskod AddVerb;
melegedik:meleged AddVerb;
militánskodik:militánskod AddVerb;
molyhosodik:molyhosod AddVerb;
mozdulatlankodik:mozdulatlankod AddVerb;
muzulmánodik:muzulmánod AddVerb;
művészkedik:művészked AddVerb;
nemlineárisodik:nemlineárisod AddVerb;
neveződik:neveződ AddVerb;
nyelveskedik:nyelvesked AddVerb;
nyápicodik:nyápicod AddVerb;
obskúruskodik:obskúruskod AddVerb;
olaszellenesedik:olaszellenesed AddVerb;
orvosolhatatlanodik:orvosolhatatlanod AddVerb;
palástolatlanodik:palástolatlanod AddVerb;
patkolatlanodik:patkolatlanod AddVerb;
perszonifikálódik:perszonifikálód AddVerb;
pitiánerkedik:pitiánerked AddVerb;
politizálódik:politizálód AddVerb;
potyázódik:potyázód AddVerb;
profánodik:profánod AddVerb;
pusztíthatatlanodik:pusztíthatatlanod AddVerb;
pótolhatatlankodik:pótolhatatlankod AddVerb;
rangsorolódik:rangsorolód AddVerb;
relativizálódik:relativizálód AddVerb;
reszketegedik:reszketeged AddVerb;
robusztusodik:robusztusod AddVerb;
rubintosodik:rubintosod AddVerb;
részrehajlatlanodik:részrehajlatlanod AddVerb;
sekélyedik:sekélyed AddVerb;
sivárodik:sivárod AddVerb;
soványodik:soványod AddVerb;
steriledik:steriled AddVerb;
szabatosodik:szabatosod AddVerb;
szanszkritelleneskedik:szanszkritellenesked AddVerb;
szeleburdiskodik:szeleburdiskod AddVerb;
szennyesedik:szennyesed AddVerb;
szertelenkedik:szertelenked AddVerb;
szittyaelleneskedik:szittyaellenesked AddVerb;
szopódik:szopód AddVerb;
szuperhatékonyodik:szuperhatékonyod AddVerb;
szándékolatlanodik:szándékolatlanod AddVerb;
szíveskedik:szívesked AddVerb;
sértetlenedik:sértetlened AddVerb;
taknyoskodik:taknyoskod AddVerb;
tatárkodik:tatárkod AddVerb;
telítetlenedik:telítetlened AddVerb;
tetőződik:tetőződ AddVerb;
toldódik:toldód AddVerb;
toszkánellenesedik:toszkánellenesed AddVerb;
trochaikusodik:trochaikusod AddVerb;
tájolódik:tájolód AddVerb;
táskásodik:táskásod AddVerb;
töprenkedik:töprenked AddVerb;
tőzsérkedik:tőzsérked AddVerb;
uniformizálódik:uniformizálód AddVerb;
utálkodik:utálkod AddVerb;
varratlanodik:varratlanod AddVerb;
veszélyezik:veszélyez AddVerb;
virgoncodik:virgoncod AddVerb;
vonódik:vonód AddVerb;
vámolódik:vámolód AddVerb;
vízkövesedik:vízkövesed AddVerb;
zsúfolódik:zsúfolód AddVerb;
áldozódik:áldozód AddVerb;
áskálódik:áskálód AddVerb;
értetlenkedik:értetlenked AddVerb;
ólálkodik:ólálkod AddVerb;
öregbedik:öregbed AddVerb;
ünnepiesedik:ünnepiesed AddVerb;
LEXICON Verb1
együtturalkodik:együtturalkod AddVerb;
